Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.902

Implementation—2009 c 412.

The director of licensing and the department of health, beginning on July 26, 2009, may take such steps as are necessary to ensure that chapter 412, Laws of 2009 is implemented July 1, 2010.

[ 2009 c 412 s 23.]